Utah statutes.
20A-15-103.   Delegates -- Candidacy -- Qualifications -- Nominating procedures.

(1)  Candidates for the office of delegate to the ratification convention shall be citizens, residents of Utah, and at least 21 years old.

(2)  Persons wishing to be delegates to the ratification convention shall:

(a)  circulate a nominating petition meeting the requirements of this section; and

(b)  obtain the signature of at least 100 registered voters.

(3) (a)  A single nominating petition may nominate any number of candidates up to 21, the total number of delegates to be elected.

(b)  Nominating petitions may not contain anything identifying a candidate's party or political affiliation.

(c)  Each nominating petition shall contain a written statement signed by each nominee, indicating either that the candidate will:

(i)  vote for ratification of the proposed amendment; or

(ii)  vote against ratification of the proposed amendment.

(d)  A nominating petition containing the names of more than one nominee may not contain the name of any nominee whose stated position in the nominating petition is inconsistent with that of any other nominee listed in the petition.

(4) (a)  Candidates shall file their nominating petitions with the lieutenant governor at least 40 days before the proclaimed date of the election.

(b)  Within 10 days after the last day for filing the petitions, the lieutenant governor shall:

(i)  declare nominated the 21 nominees in favor of ratification and the 21 nominees against ratification whose nominating petitions have been signed by the largest number of registered voters;

(ii)  decide any ties by lot drawn by the lieutenant governor; and

(iii)  certify the nominated candidates of each group to the county clerk of each county within the state.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1995 General Session

